District of Columbia statutes.
11-943

Process.

(a)

All process other than a subpena [subpoena] may be served at any place within the District of Columbia, and, when authorized by statute or by the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, at any place without the District of Columbia.

(b)

Service upon a third-party defendant, upon a person whose joinder is needed for just adjudication, and upon persons required to respond to any order of commitment for civil contempt may be served at all places outside the District of Columbia that are not more than one hundred miles from the place of hearing or trial specified.

(c)

The form, issuance, and manner of service of process shall be prescribed by rule of the court.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 487, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
1981 Ed., § 11-943.
1973 Ed., § 11-943.
In subsection (a) of this section, “subpoena” was inserted, in brackets, to correct a misspelling.